Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.05, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Rules. (a) The commissioner of corrections shall adopt by rule standards and procedures for the establishment of conditions of release and the revocation of supervised or conditional release, and shall specify the period of revocation for each violation of release. Procedures for the revocation of release shall provide due process of law for the inmate. (b) The commissioner may prohibit an inmate placed on parole, supervised release, or conditional release from using adult-use cannabis flower as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 3, or adult-use cannabis products as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 3, hemp-derived consumer products as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 35, or lower-potency hemp edibles as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 48, if the inmate undergoes a chemical use assessment and abstinence is consistent with a recommended level of care for the defendant in accordance with the criteria under section 254B.04, subdivision 4. (c) The commissioner of corrections shall not prohibit an inmate placed on parole, supervised release, or conditional release from participating in the registry program as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 61, as a condition of release or revoke a patient's parole, supervised release, or conditional release or otherwise sanction a patient on parole, supervised release, or conditional release solely for participating in the registry program or for a positive drug test for cannabis components or metabolites. new text begin (d) A supervised individual must submit to a urinalysis test as instructed by a supervision agent only if there is reasonable suspicion of illicit drug use and the source of the reasonable suspicion is documented in the supervision authority's case management system. new text end